Washington statutes.
RCW 43.79.480

Tobacco settlement account—Transfers to life sciences discovery fund—Tobacco prevention and control account.

(1) Moneys received by the state of Washington in accordance with the settlement of the state's legal action against tobacco product manufacturers, exclusive of costs and attorneys' fees, shall be deposited in the tobacco settlement account created in this section except as these moneys are sold or assigned under chapter 43.340 RCW.

(2) The tobacco settlement account is created in the state treasury. Moneys in the tobacco settlement account may only be transferred to the state general fund, and to the tobacco prevention and control account for purposes set forth in this section. The legislature shall transfer amounts received as strategic contribution payments as defined in *RCW 43.350.010 to the life sciences discovery fund created in **RCW 43.350.070. During the 2013-2015 and 2015-2017 fiscal biennia, the legislature may transfer less than the entire strategic contribution payments, and may transfer amounts attributable to strategic contribution payments into the state general fund.

(3) The tobacco prevention and control account is created in the state treasury. The source of revenue for this account is moneys transferred to the account from the tobacco settlement account, investment earnings, donations to the account, and other revenues as directed by law. Expenditures from the account are subject to appropriation.

[ 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 956; 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 980; 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 947. Prior: 2009 c 564 s 937; 2009 c 479 s 30; 2005 c 424 s 12; 2002 c 365 s 15; 1999 c 309 s 927.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: *(1) RCW 43.350.010 was repealed by 2019 c 83 s 6.

**(2) RCW 43.350.070 was recodified as RCW 43.330.500 pursuant to 2019 c 83 s 5.

Effective dates—2015 3rd sp.s. c 4: See note following RCW 28B.15.069.

Effective dates—2013 2nd sp.s. c 4: See note following RCW 2.68.020.

Effective dates—2011 1st sp.s. c 50: See note following RCW 15.76.115.

Effective date—2009 c 564: See note following RCW 2.68.020.

Effective date—2009 c 479: See note following RCW 2.56.030.

Effective date—2002 c 365: See RCW 43.340.902.

Effective dates—1999 c 309 ss 927-929, 931, and 1101-1902: "(1) Sections 927, 928, 931, and 1101 through 1902 of this act are necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and take effect immediately [May 14, 1999].

(2) Section 929 of this act takes effect September 1, 2000." [ 1999 c 309 s 2002.]

Severability—1999 c 309: See note following RCW 41.06.152.